Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 6

Federal Matching Funds

71-5-601. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, in order to maximize the medical care available to Tennesseans who are uninsurable but for the availability of Access Tennessee, federal matching funds should be identified and any applicable federal waiver should be negotiated that would enable the state to provide additional benefits or to provide subsidies to assist with payment of premiums or copayments to persons who are eligible for the Access Tennessee program or to any subset of persons who are eligible for the Access Tennessee program, including individuals with incomes below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level. It is the intent of the general assembly that any funds expended pursuant to this part in the future shall be administered in conformity with the federal determination of budget neutrality that was made in 2002 with respect to coverage of uninsurable adults under the TennCare waiver and in conformity with any federal waiver that shall be obtained in the future.

Acts 2006, ch. 961, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 961, § 5 provided that the provisions of this part shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds, and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this part, unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act. Funding was provided by Acts 2006, ch. 963.

71-5-602. Federal waiver authority for matching funds.

The commissioner is directed to identify, apply for and negotiate for federal waiver authority for matching funds to support the provision of coverage under this part, which may include innovative approaches and solutions, which may include, but are not limited to, support for health insurance subsidies.

Acts 2006, ch. 961, § 3.

71-5-603. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner may adopt any rules that are necessary and proper to implement this part, including, but not limited to, any rules or regulations necessary to identify, apply for and negotiate a federal waiver. The rules may be promulgated as emergency rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2006, ch. 961, § 4; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.